Washington statutes.
RCW 4.28.180

Personal service out-of-state.

Personal service of summons or other process may be made upon any party outside the state. If upon a citizen or resident of this state or upon a person who has submitted to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, it shall have the force and effect of personal service within this state; otherwise it shall have the force and effect of service by publication. The summons upon the party out of the state shall contain the same and be served in like manner as personal summons within the state, except it shall require the party to appear and answer within sixty days after such personal service out of the state.

[ 1959 c 131 s 1; 1895 c 86 s 3; 1893 c 127 s 11; RRS s 234.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 4(e), CR 12(a), CR 82(a).

Service of process on nonresident motor vehicle operator: RCW 46.64.040.